Massachusetts, session 194th, H3560.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10 of said chapter 25A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the
second paragraph the following paragraph:-
(1) The division shall promulgate regulations to allow all grants under the green
communities program to be used for solar photovoltaic systems mounted on municipal rooftops
or located on municipal land.
of 1